Illinois, session 104th, HB702.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-101 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/5-101)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 5-101)7    Sec. 5-101. Creation of fund. In each city of more than 8500,000 inhabitants a policemen's annuity and and benefit fund 9shall be created and maintained for the benefit of its 10policemen, their widows and children, and of all contributors 11to, participants in, and beneficiaries of any police pension 12fund in operation, by authority of law, in such city 13immediately prior to the effective date. For the purposes of 14this Article, the policemen's annuity and benefit fund may be 15referred to as the "fund."16(Source: Laws 1963, p. 161.)